Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26.9
Labor Standards in Renewable Energy Projects [Effective January 1, 2023.]

39-26.9-1.
Short title.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “Labor Standards in Renewable Energy Projects.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-2.
Definitions.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Approved apprenticeship program” or “apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship program that has been approved by the U.S. Department of Labor, or by a recognized state apprenticeship agency, pursuant to 29 C.F.R. Parts 29 and 30; however, such programs shall not include those that have obtained only provisional approval status. The required apprenticeship programs may either be programs that have specifically allocated funding and are subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq. (“ERISA”), or non-ERISA programs financed by general funds of employers.

“Covered project” means a renewable energy project that:

Utilizes renewable energy resources;

Is situated on land;

Is situated on or in water;

Has a construction commencement date on or after April 1, 2023;

Has a total nameplate capacity of three megawatts (3 MW) or more in aggregate size; and

Is constructed and/or operated pursuant to chapter 26.1, 26.4, or 26.6 of this title.

“Department” means the department of labor and training.

“Director” means the director of the department of labor and training.

“Labor organization” means any organization that exists and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection and that is not a company union as defined in §

28-7-3

.

“Labor peace agreement” means an agreement between an entity and a labor organization that, at a minimum, protects the state’s proprietary interest by prohibiting labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference during the deployment of a covered project. This agreement means that the applicant has agreed not to disrupt efforts by the labor organizations to communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the applicant’s employees. This requirement shall not be applicable to maintenance work performed on renewable energy solar projects.

“Renewable energy project” means the construction, installation, use, maintenance, operation, changing, or retiring of a renewable energy resource.

“Renewable energy resources” means any renewable power generation source listed in §

39-26-5(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-3.
Responsibilities of developers and the state, its subdivisions or quasi-public agencies.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a covered project receives any financial incentives, tax relief, or subsidies from the state or any of its subdivisions or quasi-public agencies, the developer and its contractors shall enter into a labor peace agreement with the unions constructing the project.

All specifications in any invitations to bid on any covered project under this section that is valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more shall include a requirement that all responding bidders shall have an approved apprenticeship program for all crafts or trades with apprenticeship programs that will be employed on the project at the time of bid. All responding bidders shall also provide proof in the bid package of the existence of an approved apprenticeship program for all crafts or trades that will be employed on the project by all contractors and subcontractors.

The developer of a covered project shall take all necessary actions to ensure that each contractor and subcontractor involved in the construction of the project completes a sworn certification that the prime contractor, general contractor, or subcontractor:

Has the necessary resources to perform the portion of the covered project to which the contractor or subcontractor is assigned, including the necessary technical, financial, and personnel resources;

Has all required contractor, specialty contractor or trade licenses, certifications or certificates required of any business entity or individual by applicable state or local law;

May participate in apprenticeship programs pursuant to 29 C.F.R. Part 29 and Part 30 for the occupations the contractor will employ for its awarded scope of work on the covered project;

When the contractor or subcontractor has five (5) or more employees, ensure that no less than fifteen percent (15%) of the labor hours worked on the project shall be performed by registered apprentices for all crafts or trades with approved apprenticeship programs that will be employed on the project;

During the previous three (3) years:

Has not been debarred by any government agency;

Has not defaulted on any project;

Has not had any license, certification, or other credential relating to the business revoked or suspended; and

Has not been found in violation of any law applicable to the contractor’s or subcontractor’s business that resulted in the payment of a fine, back pay damages, or any other type of penalty in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more;

Will pay personnel employed on the project not less than the applicable wage and fringe benefit rates for the classification in which such personnel is employed for the project; and

Has not misclassified and will not misclassify labor employees as independent contractors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-4.
Labor peace agreement.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

The owner or developer of a covered project or a third party acting on behalf of the owner or developer, as a condition of any agreement with a public entity, shall enter into a labor peace agreement with a labor organization actively representing employees providing necessary operations for the renewable energy system.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-5.
Prevailing wage payment for construction, operation and maintenance employees.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

Each contractor and subcontractor on a covered project shall:

Pay each construction employee wages and benefits that are not less than the prevailing wage and fringe benefit rates in compliance with chapter 13 of title 37 for the corresponding classification in which the employee is employed; and

Be subject to all reporting and compliance requirements of chapter 13 of title 37.

Contractors and subcontractors that violate subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be subject to penalties and sanctions in accordance with chapter 13 of title 37.

Each operations and maintenance employee employed in a building or facility that is constructed as a covered project shall be paid wages and benefits that are not less than the prevailing wage and fringe benefit rates in compliance with chapter 13 of title 37.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-6.
Sworn certification of compliance.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

The developer of a covered project shall submit to the department a sworn certification of compliance with this chapter, not later than thirty (30) days prior to commencement of construction of the project. The sworn certification shall be considered a public document and shall be made available, without redaction, on the department’s website not later than seven (7) days after being submitted to the department.

If the sworn certification contains false, misleading, or materially inaccurate information, the contractor or subcontractor that executed the sworn certification shall, after notice and opportunity to be heard, be subject to penalties and sanctions by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-7.
Payment of wages due.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

The department is hereby authorized and directed to pay to mechanics, laborers, and workers, from any accrued payments withheld under the terms of a terminated public works’ contract, any wages found to be due the mechanics, laborers, and workers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-8.
Recordkeeping obligations.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

Each employer that is subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:

Keep, maintain, and preserve records relating to the wages and hours worked by each mechanic, laborer, and worker and a schedule of the occupation or work classification at which each mechanic, laborer, or worker on the project is employed, during each work day and week. These records shall be maintained in a manner and form as the director establishes to assure the proper payments due to such persons or employee welfare funds under this chapter, regardless of any contractual relationship alleged to exist between the contractor and the person; and

Submit a monthly certified payroll record to the contracting agency or to the developer of a covered project, which shall consist of a complete copy of the payroll records accompanied by a statement signed by the employer that indicates:

The records are accurate;

The rate of wages paid to each mechanic, laborer, or worker and the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each such person to any employee welfare fund is not less than the prevailing rate of wages and the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each such person to any employee welfare fund and not less than those required by the contract to be paid;

The employer has complied with the applicable provisions of this chapter;

Each such person is covered by a workers’ compensation insurance policy for the duration of the person’s employment, which shall be demonstrated by submitting to the contracting agency the name of the workers’ compensation insurance carrier covering each such person, the effective and expiration dates of each policy, and each policy number;

The employer has not received any kickbacks, as defined in 41 U.S.C. § 8701, from any employee or employee welfare fund; and

Pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the employer is aware that filing a certified payroll that the employer knows to be false is a felony, for which the employer may be fined up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisoned for up to five (5) years, or both.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of the general laws, the certified payroll shall be considered a public record and every person shall have the right to inspect and copy the records.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any copy of records made available for inspection as copies and furnished upon request to the public or any public agency by the awarding body or the department of labor and training shall be redacted to prevent disclosure of an individual’s name, address, and social security number. The name and address of the contractor awarded the contract or the subcontractor performing the contract shall not be redacted. Any copy of records made available for inspection by, or furnished to, a multiemployer Taft-Hartley Trust Fund (29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5)) that requests the records for the purposes of allocating contributions to participants shall be redacted only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s full social security number, but shall provide the last four digits of the social security number. Any copy of records made available for inspection by, or furnished to, a joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. § 175a) shall be redacted only to prevent disclosure of an individual’s social security number.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, agencies and law enforcement agencies investigating violations of law shall, upon request, be provided unredacted copies of certified payroll records. Any copies of records or certified payroll made available for inspection and furnished upon request to the public by an agency or law enforcement agency investigating a violation of law shall be marked or redacted to prevent disclosure of an individual’s name, address, and social security number.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-9.
Power and enforcement of the department of labor and training.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

The director of the department of labor and training and the director’s designated representatives shall have the right to enter any place of business of employment to inspect employment records and to ensure that the provisions of this chapter are complied with as well as the power to administer oaths and examine witnesses, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and production of documents, and to take depositions and affidavits.

The department of labor and training shall promulgate regulations to implement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

39-26.9-10.
Severability.
[Effective January 1, 2023.]

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 380, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 381, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.